Utah statutes.
73-18-15.2.   Minimum age of operators -- Boating safety course for youth to
operate personal watercraft.
(1) (a)  A person under 16 years of age may not operate a motorboat on the
waters of this state unless the person is under the on-board and direct
supervision of a person who is at least 18 years of age.
(b)  A person under 16 years of age may operate a sailboat, if the person is
under the direct supervision of a person who is at least 18 years of age.
(2)  A person who is at least 12 years of age or older but under 16 years of
age may operate a personal watercraft provided he:
(a)  is under the direct supervision of a person who is at least 18 years of
age;
(b)  completes a boating safety course approved by the division; and
(c)  has in his possession a boating safety certificate issued by the boating
safety course provider.
(3)  A person who is at least 16 years of age but under 18 years of age may
operate a personal watercraft, if the person:
(a)  completes a boating safety course approved by the division; and
(b)  has in his possession a boating safety certificate issued by the boating
safety course provider.
(4)  A person required to attend a boating safety course under Subsection
(3)(a) need not be accompanied by a parent or legal guardian while completing
a boating safety course.
(5)  A person may not give permission to another person to operate a vessel in
violation of this section.
(6)  As used in this section, "direct supervision" means oversight at a
distance within which visual contact is maintained.
(7) (a)  The division may collect fees set by the board in accordance with
Section 63J-1-504 from each person who takes the division's boating safety
course to help defray the cost of the boating safety course.
(b)  Money collected from the fees collected under Subsection (7)(a) shall be
deposited in the Boating Account.
